Hawaii statutes.
§490:8-204 Effect of issuer's restriction
on transfer. A restriction on transfer of a security imposed by the
issuer, even if otherwise lawful, is ineffective against a person without
knowledge of the restriction unless:

(1) The security is certificated and the restriction
is noted conspicuously on the security certificate; or

(2) The security is uncertificated and the registered
owner has been notified of the restriction. [L 1997, c 33, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next